Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2725.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; AFRICAN AMERICAN CHILD WELLNESS INSTITUTE.new text end new text begin $5,250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $5,512,500 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to the African American Child Wellness Institute, a culturally specific African American mental health service provider that is a licensed community mental health center specializing in services for African American children and families of all ages from birth to end of life. The grant must be used to support the center in enhancing their capacity to offer culturally specific, comprehensive, trauma-informed, practice- and evidence-based, person- and family-centered mental health and substance use disorder services; supervision and training; and care coordination regardless of ability to pay or place of residence. $5,250,000 is added to the general fund base for this appropriation in fiscal year 2028, and $5,512,500 is added to the base for this appropriation in fiscal year 2029 and thereafter. new text end